Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.194.040

School districts—Additional authority and limitation.

School districts providing an education program to juvenile inmates in an adult jail facility may:

(1) Award appropriate diplomas or certificates to juvenile inmates who successfully complete graduation requirements;

(2) Allow students eighteen years of age who have participated in an education program under this chapter to continue in the program, under rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction; and

(3) Spend only funds appropriated by the legislature and allocated by the superintendent of public instruction for the exclusive purpose of maintaining and operating education programs under this chapter, including direct and indirect costs of maintaining and operating the education programs, and funds from federal and private grants, bequests, and gifts made for that purpose. School districts may not expend excess tax levy proceeds authorized for school district purposes to pay costs incurred under this chapter.

[ 2010 c 226 s 5.]